District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

31-2502.16

Acquisition, use and disposition of real estate by domestic companies.

Repealed.

Oct. 9, 1940, 54 Stat. 1071, ch. 792, ch. II, § 16
May 21, 1997, D.C. Law 11-268, § 10, 44 DCR 1730
Mar. 24, 1998, D.C. Law 12-81, § 29(b), 45 DCR 745
Apr. 11, 2003, D.C. Law 14-297, § 401(a), 50 DCR 330

History

1981 Ed., § 35-1519.
1973 Ed., § 35-1319.

Prior Codifications

Department of Insurance abolished: See Historical and Statutory Notes following § 31-2501.03.

Editor's Notes